Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska53-135.01
Retail licenses; renewal; notice.

The city, village, or county clerk shall cause to be published in a legal newspaper in or of general circulation in such city, village, or county, one time between January 10 and January 30 of each year, individual notice of the right of automatic renewal of each retail liquor and beer license, except that notice of the right of automatic renewal of Class C licenses shall be published between the dates of July 10 and July 30 of each year within such city, village, or county, in substantially the following form:

NOTICE OF RENEWAL OF RETAIL LIQUOR LICENSE

Notice is hereby given pursuant to section 53-135.01 that a liquor license may be automatically renewed for one year from May 1, 20...., or November 1, 20...., for the following retail liquor licensee:

(Name of Licensee) (Address of licensed premises)

Notice is hereby given that written protests to the issuance of automatic renewal of license may be filed by any resident of the city (village or county) on or before February 10, 20...., or August 10, 20...., in the office of the city (village or county) clerk and that in the event protests are filed by three or more such persons, hearing will be had to determine whether continuation of the license should be allowed.

(Name)

City (village or county) Clerk

Upon the conclusion of any hearing required by this section, the local governing body may request a licensee to submit an application as provided in section 53-135.

Laws 1959, c. 249, § 11, p. 870;

Laws 1961, c. 260, § 2, p. 779;

Laws 1974, LB 681, § 6;

Laws 1979, LB 224, § 3;

Laws 1983, LB 213, § 16;

Laws 1991, LB 344, § 41;

Laws 2004, LB 813, § 23.